Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 3. Firemen’s and Policemen’s Disability and Relief Funds.

§ 21-29-101.
Disability and relief fund; exception and application; discontinuance of new memberships.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, in every city of the State of Mississippi having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more, according to the last federal census, or any subsequent federal census, and in which there is a paid police department and/or fire department, it shall be the duty of the governing authorities of said municipality to create and maintain a fund known as the “disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen,” hereafter to be known as “said fund,” which shall be maintained for the benefit of the persons hereinafter named, and shall be derived, raised and administered in the manner provided in this article, except no such fund known as the “disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen” shall be created by any municipality after March 1, 1976, unless approved by an amendment to this article by the Legislature of the State of Mississippi. Further, no new members may be joined by the fund after July 1, 1987, and all new employees of the police department and/or fire department of any municipality having such funds shall become members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi after July 1, 1987.

Any reference in other sections of this article to members of the fire or police department shall be defined to include only the members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen of the municipality. The fund for each municipality shall be separately administered.

This section and Sections 21-29-103 through 21-29-151 shall not apply to any municipality wherein the qualified electors of such municipality shall have elected on or before August 6, 1940, pursuant to the then applicable law, not to have such municipality come within the provisions of Sections 21-29-101 to 21-29-151.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3472, 3474; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1960, ch. 427; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 10, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-103.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch 511, § 35, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 3493; Laws, 1940, ch. 287]

§ 21-29-105.
Administration of disability and relief funds; advisory boards.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall have operational and administrative control of the funds created herein.

In each municipality there shall be a board to serve in an advisory capacity to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System with respect to matters concerning the disability and relief fund. Such board shall consist of five (5) members as follows: two (2) shall be elected by the membership of the police department, two (2) shall be elected by the membership of the fire department; and the mayor or his designee shall be an ex officio member. Retired members of the police department and fire department may participate in elections to choose members of the board, and such retired members are also eligible to serve on the board. The term of elected members shall be for four (4) years, and any vacancy in the elected membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original membership was selected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3478, 3492; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1985, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 11; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 21-29-107.
Powers and duties of Board of Trustees.

The board of trustees shall fix a time for regular meetings in its minutes, and it shall keep minutes of its meetings which shall be public records, subject to the statutes, rules and regulations governing the board of trustees.

The board shall have the power and duty to promptly hear and pass upon all applications of firemen and/or policemen or the beneficiaries of deceased firemen and of deceased policemen for participation in the benefits of said fund. The board may appoint hearing officers to further its duties hereunder. Said board may hear witnesses, administer oaths, find facts, and make decisions in all matters properly before said board, which decisions shall be final except upon appeals in the way hereafter set forth. Said board may order payments made according to the facts found and the provisions of this article, which payments shall be made as far as funds may be available from each separate municipal fund. Said board shall have the power, with the funds they have on hand, to invest and reinvest funds under the provisions of Section 25-11-121. Such funds may be commingled with other system funds for the most advantageous investments; however, each fund shall have separate accounting status. No warrant shall be drawn against said fund without the approval of a majority of said board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3478; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 12, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§§ 21-29-109 and 21-29-111.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 35, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

21-29-109. [Codes, 1942, § 3488; Laws, 1940, ch. 287]

21-29-111. [Codes, 1942, § 3483; Laws, 1940, ch. 287]

§ 21-29-113.
Board of disability and relief appeals.

The commissioner of insurance, the attorney general, and the secretary of state of the State of Mississippi, shall be and are constituted a body to be known of the “board of disability and relief appeals,” with full duty and power to hear, consider and determine all matters brought before it on appeal from decisions of the boards of disability and relief. Determinations by said appeal board shall be final.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3479; Laws, 1940, ch. 287.

§ 21-29-115.
Appealing decisions of board of disability and relief.

The governing authorities of the city, any applicant for benefits of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen, or any two active members of said fire department or any two active members of said police department, being aggrieved at the decision or order of said board of disability and relief of said city, may file with said board of disability and relief, and with said board of disability and relief appeals duplicate copies of a petition for the rehearing of the matter in which said decision or order was made. Within thirty days thereafter said board of disability and relief of said city shall file with said appeal board, true copies of all papers and documents which were before it, all evidence of record before it and a statement of all evidence heard by it and not of record, all certified to be true and correct, whereupon said appeal board shall fix a time for hearing and shall give said disability and relief board of said city, and the petitioner or petitioners for appeal notice of said time for hearing. When the matter shall come on for hearing said appeal board shall have before it all papers, statements, matters and things certified to it by said disability and relief board, as well as such additional evidence and documents as it may hear and receive and upon all of the same shall hear, consider and decide said matter fully and finally according to this article, and the facts. Said appeal board may cause witnesses to be sworn by one of its members, or by any other authority competent to administer oaths. Said appeal board may meet for all purposes at any time in the State of Mississippi when all are present, or upon the call of two members thereof. Said appeal board shall certify its decision to the disability and relief board and the governing authorities of said city, and such decision or order shall be final and binding and the said fund shall be disbursed according thereto. Any suit or other action affecting said fund shall be disbursed according thereto. Any suit or other action affecting said fund shall be by or against said city as custodian of said fund and not against said board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3479; Laws, 1940, ch. 287.

§ 21-29-117.
Funding; tax or use of other funds, contributions, and salary deductions.

Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the governing authority of said municipality, at the time the levy is made for other municipal taxes, shall annually levy a tax on the taxable property within the said municipality, and the proceeds therefrom shall be forwarded on or before the twentieth of the following month to the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The levy made, and the deductions from the salaries of members, shall be in an amount sufficient, but not more than the amount necessary, to make the system actuarially sound by July 1, 2000, as certified to the municipality by the board. Such tax shall be in addition to any limits set forth in Sections 27-39-301 through 27-39-311, and shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Section 27-39-321, nor shall any tax increase exceed one-half (1/2) mill per year; however, if any levy to pay debt service on bonds issued under Section 31-25-21 as described in subsection (2) of this section is reduced for any year as a result of payment of the bonds or otherwise, the levy under this subsection (1) for such year may be increased by an amount, in addition to the one-half (1/2) mill otherwise authorized, not to exceed the reduction for such year in the millage levied to pay debt service on the bonds.

In addition to, or in lieu of, the method of funding provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the municipality may fund or assist in funding the retirement system through the use of revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 31-25-21. Any tax levied to service the debt on such bonds shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Section 27-39-321.

In addition, all gifts and donations made by any persons or corporations or by other appropriate levy, and all funds which the municipality may receive from insurance companies as provided for in this article shall be placed in said fund.

In addition, such municipality shall each month deduct from the salary of each member of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen not less than seven percent (7%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the amount thereof and put the amount deducted into said fund. Any increase to an amount in excess of seven percent (7%) shall be in increments of not more than one percent (1%) per annum. No increase from the deduction of seven percent (7%) shall be made unless the board determines that the avails of the tax levy of three (3) mills, when combined with the avails of the deduction of seven percent (7%), is insufficient to keep the system actuarially sound.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, when any municipality has enacted an enabling ordinance as provided in Sections 21-29-5 and 21-29-101, upon a finding that either the municipal employees’ retirement system or the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen is not funded in an actuarially sound manner which is spread upon the minutes of the board, may by order provide that the revenue or a portion thereof produced by the levy authorized for one system be diverted to fund the less actuarially sound system within the same municipality. No transfer may be made of funds from one municipality to another.

The municipality and the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may enter into such contracts and agreements as are deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, contracts and agreements addressing the use, application and investment of proceeds of bonds issued under Section 31-25-21 and earnings thereon and the relative rights and obligations of the municipality and the Public Employees’ Retirement System during the period that the bonds are outstanding and thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3473, 3475; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1958, ch. 524; Laws, 1960, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 1975, chs. 357; 463; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 535; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 509, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 548, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 506 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1997).

§ 21-29-118.
Tax proceeds transferred to Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi is hereby authorized to deduct two percent (2%) of all tax levied hereunder and paid into the “disability and relief fund” for firemen and policemen to be transferred to the expense fund of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to defray the cost of administering this fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 14, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-119.
Discontinuance and reinstatement of tax; actuarial study.

When the amount of funds derived from the tax levied pursuant to Section 21-29-117 is sufficient to care for the requirements and necessities as determined by an actuarial study, the governing authorities of said municipality shall discontinue entirely or reduce the tax rate provided in Section 21-29-117 until such time as financial necessity creates a demand for the reassessment of said tax. It is understood, however, in this connection, that when and if the tax collections as herein provided are discontinued, that said tax shall be reassessed when necessity requires, without the necessity of an election. Each municipality with a disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall have prepared an actuarial study of the fund at least every four (4) years and report the findings to the legislature of the State of Mississippi. The first such study shall be filed with the legislature in January, 1980.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3476; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1976).

§ 21-29-121.
Disability and relief fund constitutes special fund; transfer of moneys to Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall be a special trust fund and shall be disbursed only in the manner hereafter provided. Such fund shall be a part of the public funds of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and shall be kept by the board as it is required to keep its other funds. Interest earned on said fund shall be credited to and become a part of said fund. All moneys on deposit in such funds on July 1, 1987, shall be paid over to the Board of Trustees of Public Employees’ Retirement System on or before July 1, 1987.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3473, 3480; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1958, ch. 524; Laws, 1960, ch 428, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 15, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-123.
Allowances upon disability and relief fund.

All allowances made upon the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall be drawn against the fund by the board of trustees, and shall be issued only upon compliance with the rules and regulations of the board of trustees, or the board of disability and relief appeals.

HISTORY:
Code, 1942, §§ 3477, 3481; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 16, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-125.
Investment of part of disability and relief fund.

The authority is vested in the board of trustees to invest such part of said fund as may not be immediately required, in investments authorized under Section 25-11-121 with the right to change said investment from time to time, and with the right and duty to convert invested funds into current funds as the same may be needed for the purpose of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3480; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 17, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-127.
Advancements from general fund to disability and relief fund.

The governing authority may immediately advance necessary moneys from the general fund to said fund to enable payments to all qualified beneficiaries to be brought into a current status. Any moneys necessarily advanced shall be paid back to the general fund from the surplus of said fund as it is allocated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3473; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1958, ch. 524; Laws, 1960, ch. 428, § 1.

§ 21-29-129.
Who entitled to benefits.

Every member of said fire department and police department including its officers, but not including the governing authorities of said city on account of their relation as such to said fire department and/or police department, who are members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall come under the provisions and benefits of this article and shall receive all benefits provided for in this article. All firemen and policemen who are employed in the said fire department or police department after adoption of a resolution by the municipality in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 21-29-17 shall not become members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen.

However, in any municipality having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand (28,000) and not more than thirty thousand (30,000) according to the 1960 decennial census and located in a county having an assessed valuation in 1969 of not less than Eighty-five Million Dollars ($85,000,000.00) and not more than Ninety Million Dollars ($90,000,000.00), any former member of the fire or police department with thirteen (13) or more consecutive and paid years longevity retirement benefits in the retirement system, who remains in public service of such municipality in an elected capacity which includes ex officio chief of police or fire department, such elected public service shall be credited under this article, when the member pays into the system all employer and employee contributions with any interest or earnings thereon based upon the salary he received during the last six (6) months of his employment as a fireman or policeman prior to his becoming an elected official, and his retirement benefits shall be computed upon the salary so received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3484; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1971, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1976).

§ 21-29-131.
Service records to be kept.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall keep a record of service of the members of said fire department and police department, which record shall show the history of employment of each member of said fire department and police department. Said record shall be entered up fully at the time such city comes within the terms of this article, and it shall thereafter be kept entered up fully and correctly. All records currently maintained by the municipality’s affected membership shall be forwarded to the Public Employees’ Retirement System not later than July 1, 1987. Any additional changes shall be forwarded to the Public Employees’ Retirement System as made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3482; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 18, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-133.
Disability benefits; injury or illness resulting from discharge of duties.

If any member of said fire department or police department shall become or be found to be totally disabled for the discharge of his duties as a member of said fire department or police department, mentally or physically, by reason of sickness or injury caused or sustained by reason of service or discharge of his duty in said department, after such city shall have come within the terms of this article, said disability and relief board shall order the payment and there shall be paid from said fund to said fireman or policeman each month thereafter an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of said fireman’s or policeman’s monthly salary, to be paid throughout such total disability for service. In passing upon the question of disability, said board shall require an examination of the applicant by the city physician or other physician or physicians as it may deem proper, and may require like examinations from time to time throughout the period of disability claimed by said fireman or policeman. If said city pays a salary to its firemen or policemen while disabled in an amount equal to the disability relief allowed under this section, said fireman or policeman shall not be entitled to any disability relief under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3485; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1964, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 395 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1974).

§ 21-29-135.
Disability benefits; illness or injury resulting from other than discharge of duties.

Should any member of a fire or police department become or be found to be permanently and totally disabled for the discharge of his duties as a member of said fire department or police department, mentally or physically, by reason of sickness or injury, and who has had not less than five years’ service with such department, there shall be paid to said fireman or policeman from the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund, provided the municipality has such a fund, for each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty years, one-fortieth of the monthly salary of such policeman or fireman at the time such disability is incurred, to be paid throughout such permanent and total disability. In passing upon the question of disability said board shall require an examination of the applicant by the city physician or other physician or physicians as it may deem proper, and may require like examinations from time to time throughout the period of disability claimed by said fireman or policeman. If said city pays a salary to its firemen or policemen while disabled in an amount equal to the disability relief allowed under this section, said firemen or policemen shall not be entitled to any disability relief under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3485.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 504, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1964).

§ 21-29-137.
Physical and mental examinations.

In all matters involving the disability or sickness of a member of such fire and/or police department, such member shall submit himself to physical and mental examination when and as required by said disability and relief board of said governing authorities. A failure or refusal so to do shall suspend the benefits of Sections 21-29-133 and 21-29-135, until such time as he shall submit himself to such examination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3489; Laws, 1940, ch. 287.

§ 21-29-139.
Retirement benefits.

If any member of said fire and/or police department who has been in paid fire and/or police department service for as long as twenty (20) years before making application hereinafter mentioned, the last ten (10) years of which shall have been continuous in the city in which the application is made, shall make written application for retirement and relief, the board of disability and relief shall, without medical examination of disability, retire him from active service in said fire and/or police department. Upon such retirement from active service, said board of disability and relief shall order the payment to such retired member monthly from said fund a sum equal to fifty percent (50%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received as salary by such member in the six-month period next before the filing of such application in said fire and/or police department. Such payments shall thereafter be made to said retired member for life, such payment to be known as “retired relief.”

Any member of the fire and/or police department who has been in paid fire and/or police department service for longer than twenty (20) years in a municipality shall be entitled and shall receive additional retired relief payment for life in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1-7/10%) of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by such member in the six-month period next preceding the filing of said application, for each full year of service in excess of twenty (20) years’ service. However, no retired relief payment to any member shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding the filing of said application.

The said board shall, when a member of the fire and/or police department reaches the age of sixty-five (65), retire him from active service in said fire and/or police department and order the payment of such funds as the member is entitled to hereunder.

Periods of time in which a member may have been inactive on account of physical or mental disability shall not be excluded in computing the twenty-year period and the ten-year period hereinbefore mentioned. Periods of time within which a member may have been absent from his employment while in active service of the Army or Navy of the United States, United States Marine Corps or the United States Coast Guard between September 16, 1940, and July 25, 1947, or while as a civil employee engaged by the Army and Navy while serving outside the continental United States shall not be excluded in computing the twenty-year period and the ten-year period hereinbefore mentioned, provided that the discharge or release of such member from the armed forces was under conditions other than dishonorable. Any member who has been retired or is voluntarily retired hereunder, or who has received relief or disability benefits hereunder, shall be required to perform such duties as then may be required of him.

Provided, however, in any city having a population of nineteen thousand (19,000) but less than twenty thousand (20,000), according to the 1970 census, the periods of time not exceeding four (4) years within which a member of the fire or police departments may have been absent from his employment while in active service in the Armed Forces of the United States, shall not be excluded in computing the twenty-year period and the ten-year period mentioned in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3486; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1970, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 475, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 582, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1993).

§ 21-29-141.
Refunds.

Any member of the fire and/or police department who ceases to be an employee before becoming eligible to receive either a service or disability allowance, as provided by this article, may file a request in writing with the board of disability and relief for a refund of all sums contributed by him to the fund, which sums shall be paid to him, without interest, within one year of the filing of the request.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3486; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1970, ch. 512, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1971.

§ 21-29-143.
Loss of benefits in case of transfer.

Any person receiving relief or benefits under the provisions of this article shall not be entitled to said benefits should such person attach himself to a paid fire department or police department in another city having a paid retirement benefit program for firemen or policemen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3486; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1970, ch. 512, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1971.

§ 21-29-145.
Death benefits where death results from discharge of duty or after retirement.

[For any municipality that has not elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of the fire or police department dies in active service, or dies in inactive service on account of disability approved for disability relief under the provisions of Section 21-29-133, as a result of injury received while in the discharge of duty in the service of the fire department or police department, or dies as a result of sickness or disease, due to the discharge of duty while in service as a member of the fire or police department, or if the member dies while entitled to relief after retirement under Section 21-29-139, the amount of disability relief or retirement being paid, or which should have been properly paid, shall continue to be paid from the fund to the spouse of the deceased member for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member, so long as the spouse remains unmarried. If, after the marriage of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children. After the death or marriage of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father, mother, or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives, or if there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the unmarried dependent sister or dependent sisters of the deceased, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sister, all payments shall cease to her. Payments to dependents under this section are for services rendered by the members of the fire and/or police department, and the amount of payment is within the discretion of the board of disability and relief, but in no event shall the amount payable under this section be in excess of the amount that would have been payable as disability and relief to a member of the department. If the father, mother, or sisters are not wholly dependent, then they shall not receive any amount in excess of the difference between the income of the father, mother, sister or sisters, and the amount that the deceased member would have been entitled to.

For purposes of this section:

“Dependent” means wholly dependent upon the deceased at the time of his death.

“Child” or “children” means:

Children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18);

Children of the deceased member eighteen (18) years of age or older who have not yet reached their twenty-third birthday and are pursuing a full-time education; or

Children of the deceased member who, though eighteen (18) years of age or older, are wholly dependent upon the deceased member and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3487; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1974, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-145.
Death benefits where death results from discharge of duty or after retirement.

[For any municipality that has elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of the fire or police department dies in active service, or dies in inactive service on account of disability approved for disability relief under the provisions of Section 21-29-133, as a result of injury received while in the discharge of duty in the service of the fire department or police department, or dies as a result of sickness or disease, due to the discharge of duty while in service as a member of the fire or police department, or if the member dies while entitled to relief after retirement under Section 21-29-139, the amount of disability relief or retirement being paid, or which should have been properly paid, shall continue to be paid from the fund to the spouse of the deceased member for life for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse, but there remains a child or children of the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children. After the death of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by spouse or child or children, but is survived by a father, mother or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives. If there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the unmarried dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sister, all payments shall cease to her. Payments to dependents under this section are for services rendered by the members of the fire and/or police department, and the amount of payment is within the discretion of the board of disability and relief, but in no event shall the amount payable under this section be in excess of the amount that would have been payable as disability and relief to a member of the department. If the father, mother or sisters are not wholly dependent, then they shall not receive any amount in excess of the difference between the income of the father, mother, sister or sisters, and the amount that the deceased member would have been entitled to.

For the purposes of this section:

“Dependent” means wholly dependent upon the deceased member at the time of his or her death.

“Child” or “children” means:

Children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18);

Children of the deceased member who are eighteen (18) years of age or older who have not yet reached their twenty-third birthday and are pursuing a full-time education; or

Children of the deceased member who, though eighteen (18) years of age or older, are wholly dependent upon the deceased member and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3487; Laws, 1940, ch. 287; Laws, 1974, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-29-147.
Death benefits where death results from other causes.

[For any municipality that has not elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

If any member of a fire or police department dies while a member of the fire or police department, and has had not less than five (5) years’ service with the department, there shall be paid from the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief fund benefits as follows:

For each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death; and

For each full year of active service in excess of twenty (20) years service, an additional payment in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1-7/10%) of the same average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by the member in the six-month period next preceding his or her death (provided that no such payment shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding his or her death) to the spouse of the deceased member for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years, so long as he or she remains unmarried, and if, after the marriage of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member still under the age of eighteen (18) years, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children, so long as the child or children are under the age of eighteen (18) years. After the death or marriage of the spouse , all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death or attainment of the age of eighteen (18) years of any child or children of the deceased member, all payments to the child or children over eighteen (18) years of age shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by spouse or child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, but is survived by a father, mother or an unmarried sister dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother or both, so long as each lives. If there is no dependent father or mother surviving the deceased member, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent sister or sisters of the deceased member, or dependent incurable children of the deceased member, so long as the beneficiary or beneficiaries remain unmarried. Upon the death or marriage of any such sisters, all payments shall cease to her. The word “dependent” as used in this section shall mean “wholly dependent.”

It is the intention of the Legislature that the benefits authorized by paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, shall be paid to all qualified and eligible spouses whose deceased spouses died before March 27, 1978.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3487.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 546; Laws, 1978, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2004.